Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-815
Violation; penalty.

Any corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association, and any president, director, treasurer, officer, corporator, partner, member, associate, or agent thereof who in its behalf engages in such business in violation of sections 59-801 to 59-831 shall for each offense, in addition to such penalty for contempt as the court in case of disobedience to its lawful order may impose, be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 12, p. 641;

R.S.1913, § 4056;

C.S.1922, § 3459;

C.S.1929, § 59-812;

R.S.1943, § 59-815;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 66;

Laws 1983, LB 32, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 370;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 6.